Hawaii statutes.
§334-128 Treatment costs and fees. Private
treatment pursuant to the court order shall be at the expense of the subject of
the petition, except to the extent such charges are covered by other laws or
programs. Treatment through a designated mental health program shall be
pursuant to its fee schedules; however, the subject of the order shall not be
denied treatment by a designated mental health program for failure to pay the
fees. [L 1984, c 251, pt of §1; am L 2013, c 221, §§14, 24; am L 2016, c 114,
§6]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next